Wyoming statutes. Title 34 Property, Conveyances and Security Transactions
Chapter 8 Comprehensive Curative Act

Cross references. —

For provision that claim of adverse possession shall not invalidate conveyance, see §

34-1-112

.

For duty of abstractors to have complete set of abstracts, give bond and file same with county clerk, see §

33-2-101

.

Law reviews. —

See comment, “Remedial Title Legislation for Wyoming,” VII Land & Water L. Rev. 561 (1972).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

23 Am. Jur. 2d Deeds § 165.

Slander of title: sufficiency of plaintiff's interest in real property to maintain action, 86 ALR4th 738.

26A C.J.S. Deeds §§ 72, 156.

§ 34-8-101.
Short title.

This act [§§

34-8-101

through

34-8-105

] shall be known as “The Comprehensive Curative Act”, and may be quoted and cited as such.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 54, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 34-107.

Cited

in

Dechert v. Christopulos, 604 P.2d 1039,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 223

(Wyo. 1980).

§ 34-8-102.
Provisions cumulative.

The provisions of this act [§§

34-8-101

through

34-8-105

] shall be cumulative and in addition to all other like acts and statutes previously enacted.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 54, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 34-108.

§ 34-8-103.
When defective instruments validated by operation of law.

When an instrument of writing, in any manner affecting or purporting to affect the title to real estate, has been, or may hereafter be recorded for a period of ten (10) years in the office of the county clerk of the county wherein such real estate is situated, and such instrument, or the record thereof, because of defect, irregularity or omission, fails to comply in any respect with any statutory requirement or requirements relating to the execution, attestation, acknowledgment, certificate of acknowledgment, recording or certificate of recording, such instrument and the record thereof shall, notwithstanding any or all such defects, irregularities and omissions, be fully legal, valid, binding and effectual for all purposes to the same extent as though such instrument had, in the first instance, been in all respects duly executed, attested, and acknowledged and recorded.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 54, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 34-109; Laws 2009, ch. 168, § 206.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, deleted “and ex officio register of deeds” following “county clerk.”

Error in legal description not cured. —

The defects cured by this chapter include defects and irregularities in the formalities of execution, recording, attestation and acknowledgement of instruments affecting title to property, and since a proper legal description of the property affected by the recorded instrument does not constitute a formality, this chapter will not cure an error in that description. Bummer v. Collier, 864 P.2d 453,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 181

(Wyo. 1993).

§ 34-8-104.
Enumerated defects.

The defects, irregularities and omissions mentioned in W.S.

34-8-103

shall include all defects and irregularities in respect to formalities of execution and recording, and all defects and irregularities in, as well as the entire lack or omission of attestation, acknowledgment, certificate of acknowledgments, or certificate of recording, and shall apply with like force to instruments whether or not the real estate involved is homestead; and shall apply to instruments in which the marital status of any grantor is not given.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 54, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 34-110.

Cross references. —

For provisions as to homestead generally, see §

1-20-101

et seq.

§ 34-8-105.
Instruments as evidence after validation.

From and after its validation by the operation of W.S.

34-8-103

, such instrument shall impart notice to subsequent purchasers, encumbrancers, and all other persons whomsoever so far as and to the same extent that the same is recorded, notwithstanding such defects, irregularities or omissions; and such instrument, the record thereof, or a duly authenticated copy, shall be competent evidence to the same extent as such instrument would have been competent if valid in the first instance.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 54, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 34-111.